test/src/morphology/N-xasawa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - хасава: # Noun 'man' - partial paradigm /Type 22/
     хасава+N+Sg+Nom: хасава
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc: хасавамʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen: хасаваʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat: хасаванʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc: хасавахана
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl: хасавахад
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros: хасававна
     хасава+N+Du+Nom: хасавахаʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Acc: хасавахаʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Gen: хасавахаʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Nom: хасаваˮ
     хасава+N+Pl+Acc: хасев
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen: хасевˮ
     хасава+N+Pl+Dat: хасавахаˮ
     хасава+N+Pl+Loc: хасавахаˮна
     хасава+N+Pl+Abl: хасавахат
     хасава+N+Pl+Pros: хасаваˮмна

     хасава+N+Tra: хасаваӈэ
     хасава+N+Car: хасавасиˮ
     хасава+N+Equ: хасавадремʼ
     хасава+N+Equ+Lat: хасавадревʼ

# Possessive forms 
     хасава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: хасавав 
     хасава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хасавар  
     хасава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хасавада 
     хасава+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: хасавамиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: хасавариʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хасавадиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: хасававаˮ
     хасава+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: хасавараˮ
     хасава+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хасавадоʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: хасавав   
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: хасавами  
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: хасавамд  
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: хасавамда 
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: хасавамиʼ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: хасавамдиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: хасавамдиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: хасававаˮ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: хасавамдаˮ
     хасава+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хасавамдоʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: хасаван   
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: хасавани  
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: хасаванд  
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: хасаванда 
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: хасаваниʼ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хасавандиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хасавандиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: хасаванаˮ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хасавандаˮ
     хасава+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хасавандоʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: хасавахан   
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: хасавахани  
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: хасаваханд  
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: хасаваханда 
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: хасаваханиʼ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: хасавахандиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: хасавахандиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: хасаваханаˮ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хасавахандаˮ
     хасава+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хасавахандоʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хасаваханан   
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хасаваханани  
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хасавахананд  
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хасавахананда 
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: хасавахананиʼ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: хасаваханандиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: хасаваханандиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хасавахананаˮ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хасаваханандаˮ
     хасава+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хасаваханандоʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хасавахадан   
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хасавахадани  
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хасавахаданд  
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хасавахаданда 
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: хасавахаданиʼ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: хасавахадандиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: хасавахадандиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хасавахаданаˮ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хасавахадандаˮ
     хасава+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хасавахадандоʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: хасававнан   
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: хасававнани  
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: хасававнанд  
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: хасававнанда 
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: хасававнаниʼ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: хасававнандиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: хасававнандиʼ
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: хасававнанаˮ 
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: хасававнандаˮ
     хасава+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: хасававнандоʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: хасавахаюн  
     хасава+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: хасавахаюд  
     хасава+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хасавахаюда 
     хасава+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: хасавахаюниʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: хасавахаюдиʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: хасавахаюдиʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хасавахаюнаˮ
     хасава+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хасавахаюдаˮ
     хасава+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хасавахаюдоʼ;
     хасава+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: хасавахаюн  
     хасава+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: хасавахаюд  
     хасава+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: хасавахаюда 
     хасава+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: хасавахаюниʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: хасавахаюдиʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: хасавахаюдиʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: хасавахаюнаˮ
     хасава+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хасавахаюдаˮ
     хасава+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хасавахаюдоʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: хасавахаюн  
     хасава+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: хасавахают  
     хасава+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: хасавахаюта 
     хасава+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: хасавахаюниʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: хасавахаютиʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: хасавахаютиʼ
     хасава+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: хасавахаюнаˮ
     хасава+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хасавахаютаˮ
     хасава+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хасавахаютоʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: хасеван   
     хасава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: хасевад   
     хасава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хасевада  
     хасава+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хасеваниʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: хасевадиʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: хасевадиʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хасеванаˮ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хасевадаˮ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хасевадоʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: хасеван   
     хасава+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: хасевад   
     хасава+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хасевада  
     хасава+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хасеваниʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: хасевадиʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: хасевадиʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хасеванаˮ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хасевадаˮ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хасевадоʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: хасеваˮн  
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: хасеваˮни 
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хасеват   
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хасевата  
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хасеваˮниʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хасеватиʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хасеватиʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хасеваˮнаˮ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хасеватаˮ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хасеватоʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: хасавахаˮн 
     хасава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: хасавахат 
     хасава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: хасавахата 
     хасава+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: хасавахаˮниʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: хасавахатиʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: хасавахатиʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: хасавахаˮнаˮ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хасавахатаˮ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хасавахатоʼ 
     хасава+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: хасавахаˮнан  
     хасава+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: хасавахаˮнат  
     хасава+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хасавахаˮната 
     хасава+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: хасавахаˮнаниʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: хасавахаˮнатиʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: хасавахаˮнатиʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хасавахаˮнанаˮ
     хасава+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хасавахаˮнатаˮ
     хасава+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хасавахаˮнатоʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: хасавахатан 
     хасава+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: хасавахатат 
     хасава+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хасавахатата 
     хасава+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: хасавахатаниʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: хасавахататиʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: хасавахататиʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хасавахатанаˮ
     хасава+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: хасавахататаˮ
     хасава+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: хасавахататоʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: хасаваˮманан  
     хасава+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хасаваˮманат  
     хасава+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хасаваˮманата 
     хасава+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хасаваˮмананиʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хасаваˮманатиʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хасаваˮманатиʼ
     хасава+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хасаваˮмананаˮ
     хасава+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хасаваˮманатаˮ
     хасава+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хасаваˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative !Should be added
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: хасавадмʼ
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хасаван  
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хасава   
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хасаваниʼ
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хасавадиʼ
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хасавахаʼ
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хасававаˮ
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хасавадаˮ
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хасаваˮ  
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: хасавадамзь
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хасаванась 
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хасавась   
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хасаванинзь
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хасавадинзь
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хасаваханзь
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хасававаць 
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хасавадаць 
     хасава+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хасаваць   
